Maine, session 132, LD1693.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 34-A MRSA §3036-C is enacted to read:
§3036-C. Sustainable housing development work program
1. Establishment. In accordance with the requirements of this section, the department,
in consultation with the Department of Labor and the Maine State Housing Authority, shall
establish and administer a sustainable housing development work program, referred to in
this section as “the program,” for eligible residents committed to the department. For the
purposes of this section, "resident" has the same meaning as in section 3015, subsection 1,
paragraph B.
2. Eligibility. The department shall establish eligibility standards for resident
participation in the program and shall ensure that residents participating in the program
accurately reflect the demographics of the general resident populations of all correctional
facilities.
3. Purposes. The program must be designed to:
A. Train participating residents in home construction and carpentry, renewable energy
installation, green building techniques, life skills, financial literacy and environmental
stewardship;
B. Establish partnerships with community colleges and trade organizations to offer
home construction-related certification programs to participating residents;
C. Facilitate the construction of homes by participating residents and others.
(1) A home constructed through the program must:
(a) Meet or exceed applicable energy efficiency standards under the Maine
Uniform Building and Energy Code under Title 10, chapter 1103; and
(b) Have at least 50% of its energy consumption provided by renewable energy
sources.
(2) Priority must be given to materials sourced from within the State in
constructing homes, and construction waste must be minimized by using
appropriate recycling programs.
(3) Homes constructed through the program must be owned by the State, through
the Maine State Housing Authority or other state entity as determined by the
commissioner; and
D. To the greatest extent possible, facilitate the acquisition of living arrangements for
residents who participated in the program in homes that were constructed under the
program upon completion of each resident’s sentence of imprisonment and release
from a correctional facility.
4. Sentence deduction. Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, a
resident participating in the program is eligible for a deduction of one day from the
resident’s sentence of imprisonment for every 40 hours of work completed under the
program, with total deductions under this subsection not to exceed 25% of the resident’s
original sentence, subject to satisfaction of the following conditions, as determined by the
commissioner:
Page 1 - 132LR2350(01)

A. The resident has maintained a custody classification of minimum or lower and
demonstrated good conduct throughout the resident’s participation in the program; and
B. The resident has consistently met safety and quality standards in the resident's
completed work under the program.
5. Sustainable Housing Development Work Program Fund; program funding.
The Sustainable Housing Development Work Program Fund, referred to in this section as
“the fund,” is established within the department as a nonlapsing fund for the purpose of
receiving any funds to support the program. The department may accept money for deposit
into the fund from any source, public or private, and money in the fund may be used to
offset the costs of training and materials related to the program. The department shall seek
additional funding for the program through grants, private sector partnerships and federal
programs to support green energy and housing development.
6. Program oversight committee. The commissioner, in consultation with the
Department of Labor and the Maine State Housing Authority, shall establish a committee
to provide independent oversight of the program, including by monitoring the program’s
implementation and continued adherence to the requirements of this section and the rules
adopted by the department pursuant to subsection 8.
7. Reporting. On or before January 1, 2026, and annually thereafter, department shall
submit a report to the joint standing committee of the Legislature having jurisdiction over
criminal justice and public safety matters, which must include, but is not limited to, the
following information regarding the program: the training opportunities for residents
provided under the program, the number of homes built through the program, the green
building techniques integrated into those homes, sentence reductions provided through the
program, recidivism rates for residents who participated in the program and financial
expenditures related to the program. After reviewing the report, the committee may report
out to the Legislature related legislation.
8. Rules. The department, after consultation with the Department of Labor and the
Maine State Housing Authority, shall adopt rules as necessary to implement this section.
Rules adopted pursuant to this subsection are routine technical rules as defined in Title 5,
chapter 375, subchapter 2-A.
Sec. 2. Bureau of Revenue Services; sustainable housing development
prison work program tax credit. The Department of Administrative and Financial
Services, Bureau of Revenue Services shall develop a proposal for implementation of a
refundable tax credit for persons donating materials or services to the sustainable housing
development work program established by the Department of Corrections pursuant to the
Maine Revised Statutes, Title 34-A, section 3036-C. The credit must be equal to 100% of
the market value of the documented materials or services provided to that program by a
person. By December 3, 2025, the bureau shall submit a report setting forth the tax credit
proposal, including necessary implementing legislation, along with any recommendations
to the Joint Standing Committee on Taxation. After reviewing the report, the committee
may report out related legislation to the Second Regular Session of the 132nd Legislature.
Page 2 - 132LR2350(01)